Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.250

Risk management—Risk manager may delegate powers and duties.

The risk manager may delegate to a state agency the authority to carry out any powers or duties of the risk manager under this chapter related to claims administration and purchase of insurance for the purpose of protecting any classes of officers, employees, or for other persons performing services for the state. Such delegation shall be made only upon a determination by the risk manager that another agency has sufficient resources to carry out the functions delegated.

[ 1989 c 419 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.